Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2601.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Chapter 63 of Title 42 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a subchapter to read:SUBCHAPTER HRECLAIM PROGRAMSec.6391. Definitions.6392. RECLAIM Program.6393. Delinquent youth care and custody funds.6394. Allocations.6395. RECLAIM Advisory Committee.6396. Rules and regulations.12345678910111213141516171819 6397. Funding.§ 6391. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this subchapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Adult." An individual who is 18 years of age or older."Advisory committee." The RECLAIM Advisory Committee established under section 6395(a) (relating to RECLAIM Advisory Committee)."Bed day." The length of time that a delinquent juvenile is assigned a bed for an overnight stay while held in a detention facility."Delinquent juvenile." A juvenile who has been adjudicated delinquent or is at risk of an adjudication of delinquency."Department." The Department of Human Services of the Commonwealth."Detention facility." As follows:(1) Premises or a part of premises, which are privately or publicly owned and operated, designated by the court and approved by the department to detain a juvenile temporarily.(2) The term does not include a county jail, State prison, penal institution or other facility used primarily to detain adults who have not been released on bail and who are alleged to have committed a criminal offense."Fund." A delinquent youth care and custody fund established by a county under section 6393 (relating to delinquent youth care and custody funds)."Juvenile." An individual who is under 18 years of age."Placement facility." As follows:(1) Premises or a part of premises, which are privately 20260HB2601PN3525 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 or publicly owned and operated, identified by their charter, articles of incorporation or program description, to receive delinquent juveniles or otherwise provide treatment to juveniles as a case disposition.(2) The term includes a residential facility, group home, after-school program and day program, whether secure or nonsecure.(3) The term does not include a county jail or State prison."Program." The RECLAIM Program established under section 6392(a) (relating to RECLAIM Program)."Secretary." The Secretary of Human Services of the Commonwealth.§ 6392. RECLAIM Program.(a) Establishment and purpose.--The RECLAIM Program is established in the department as a funding initiative to assist juvenile courts in developing new and improved services for the care and custody of delinquent juveniles.(b) Application process generally.--The department shall:(1) Develop an application form for each juvenile court of a county to use in requesting money through the program.(2) Prescribe the process to submit a completed application under this subsection.(c) Agreement.--Each juvenile court of a county shall prepare an annual funding initiative agreement, which must:(1) Accompany a completed application under this section.(2) Specify the proposed programs, care and services that will be funded under the program.(3) Include a method of ensuring equal access for 20260HB2601PN3525 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 minority youth to the programs, care and services specified in the annual agreement.(d) Review and determination.--(1) The department shall review and determine whether to approve or disapprove, in whole or in part, each completed application under this section.(2) If the department disapproves, in whole or in part, the completed application, the department shall provide the reasons for the disapproval in writing to the applicant.(e) Uses of grant.--A grant under the program may be used for the operational costs for:(1) The diagnosis, care or treatment of delinquent juveniles at institutions that have entered into an agreement with the department to provide those types of services to delinquent juveniles.(2) Placement facilities that are constructed, reconstructed, improved or financed for the purpose of providing alternative placement and services for delinquent juveniles whose care and custody have been diverted from institutions that have traditionally provided the placement and services.(3) County juvenile courts that administer programs and services for the prevention, early intervention, diversion, treatment and rehabilitation services and programs for delinquent juveniles.(4) Administrative expenses that the department incurs in connection with the programs and services for delinquent juveniles.§ 6393. Delinquent youth care and custody funds.(a) Establishment.--Each county treasurer shall establish in 20260HB2601PN3525 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the county treasury a fund that shall be known as the Delinquent Youth Care and Custody Fund for the county to use to implement and administer the program at the county level.(b) Purpose.--A fund of a county shall receive deposits from the department through the program based on the formulas specified in this subchapter, to be used by the juvenile court of the county for the purposes described in this subchapter.(c) Conditions.--The money disbursed to a county and deposited into the fund of the county:(1) May not be commingled with any other county money.(2) May not be used for a capital construction project.(3) Shall be disbursed to the juvenile court for use in accordance with this subchapter.(4) May not revert to the county general fund at the end of a fiscal year.(5) Shall carry over in the fund from the end of a fiscal year to the next fiscal year.(d) Maximum balance carryover.--(1) The maximum balance carryover for a fund in a county at the end of each fiscal year may not exceed an amount to be calculated as provided in the formula specified in this subsection, unless the county applied for and was granted an exemption by the department.(2) Beginning June 30, 2027, the maximum balance carryover at the end of each fiscal year shall be determined by the following formula:(i) For fiscal year 2027, the maximum balance carryover shall be 100% of the allocation for fiscal year 2026, to be applied in determining the fiscal year 2028 allocation.20260HB2601PN3525 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (ii) For fiscal year 2028, the maximum balance carryover shall be 50% of the allocation for fiscal year 2027, to be applied in determining the fiscal year 2029 allocation.(iii) For fiscal year 2029, the maximum balance carryover shall be 25% of the allocation for fiscal year 2028, to be applied in determining the fiscal year 2030 allocation.(iv) For each fiscal year subsequent to fiscal year 2029, the maximum balance carryover shall be 25% of the allocation for the immediately preceding fiscal year, to be applied in determining the allocation for the next immediate fiscal year.(3) The department shall:(i) Withhold from future payments to a county an amount equal to any money in the fund of the county that exceeds the total maximum balance carryover that applies for the county for the fiscal year in which the payments are being made.(ii) Reallocate the withheld amount described in subparagraph (i).(e) Rules by department.--The department shall adopt rules for:(1) The withholding and reallocation of money under this section.(2) The criteria and process for a county to obtain an exemption from the withholding requirement under this section.(f) Supplemental purposes only.--The money deposited into a fund shall be in addition to, and shall not be used to reduce, 20260HB2601PN3525 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 any of the following:(1) A usual annual increase in county funding that the juvenile court is eligible to receive.(2) The current level of county funding of the juvenile court and of any programs or services for delinquent juveniles.(g) Consultation and coordination.--The juvenile court of a county may consult and coordinate with the Pennsylvania Commission on Crime and Delinquency in the use of the money.§ 6394. Allocations.(a) Authorization.--In consultation with the advisory committee, the department shall:(1) Allocate annual operational money in accordance with section 6392(c) (relating to RECLAIM Program).(2) Adjust the allocations when modifications are made to the amount of the money appropriated for the program.(b) Formula.--(1) In making allocations to counties under the program, the department shall base the amounts on the immediately prior year's funding calculated using the ratio of the department's commitments of delinquent juveniles to institutional and placement facilities to each county's average of delinquent youth adjudications, in order to provide to each county a proportional allocation of commitment credits.(2) In performing the calculation described in paragraph (1), the department shall first determine for each county and for the Commonwealth:(i) A 10-year average of delinquent juvenile adjudications.20260HB2601PN3525 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (ii) The number of charged bed days for delinquent juveniles from the previous year.(3) The department shall calculate a county's allocation of credits by:(i) dividing the Statewide total number of charged bed days by the Statewide total number of delinquent youth adjudications; and(ii) multiplying the quotient under subparagraph (i) by the number of adjudications for each court.(4) The department shall subtract from the allocation determined under this subsection one credit for every chargeable bed day that a delinquent juvenile is in the department's custody and two-thirds of a credit for every chargeable bed day that a delinquent juvenile stays in a placement facility. At the end of the year, the department shall divide the amount of remaining credits of that county's allocation by the total number of remaining credits to all counties, to determine the county's percentage, which shall then be applied to the total county allocation to determine the county's payment for the fiscal year.(c) Reduction of allocations.--The department shall determine the county against which a reduction of allocation under subsection (b) will be charged for a particular juvenile, until each juvenile is released, as follows:(1) In the event of a commitment, the reduction shall be charged against the committing county.(2) In the event of a recommitment, the reduction shall be charged against the original committing county until the expiration of the minimum period of institutionalization under the original order of commitment or until the date on 20260HB2601PN3525 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 which the juvenile is admitted to the county children and youth social service agency pursuant to the order of recommitment, whichever is later. Reductions of the allocation shall be charged against the county that recommitted the youth after the minimum expiration date of the original commitment.(3) In the event of a revocation of a release on parole, the reduction shall be charged against the county that revokes the juvenile's parole.(d) Payments.--(1) The department shall pay the allocations under this section to counties three times during each fiscal year as follows:(i) 50% no later than July 15.(ii) 25% no later than January 15.(iii) 25% no later than June 15.(2) Allocations for a county shall be deposited into the fund of the county.§ 6395. RECLAIM Advisory Committee.(a) Establishment.--The RECLAIM Advisory Committee is established to assist the department in implementing and administering the program.(b) Members.--The advisory committee shall consist of the following members:(1) The secretary or a designee authorized to act on behalf of the secretary.(2) The Secretary of the Budget or a designee authorized to act on behalf of the Secretary of the Budget.(3) The executive director of the Pennsylvania Commission on Crime and Delinquency.20260HB2601PN3525 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (4) The chairperson and minority chairperson of the Judiciary Committee of the Senate or designees.(5) The chairperson and minority chairperson of the Judiciary Committee of the House of Representatives or designees.(6) Two judges from the Juvenile Court Judges' Commission.(7) Two juvenile court administrators appointed by the Juvenile Court Judges' Commission.(8) A member of the County Commissioners Association of Pennsylvania, appointed by the County Commissioners Association of Pennsylvania.(c) Appointment.--No later than 30 days after the effective date of this subsection, the members of the advisory committee shall be appointed or designated.(d) Notice.--The secretary shall be notified of the names of the members of the advisory committee.(e) Membership structure.--Membership on the advisory committee does not, by itself:(1) Constitute the holding of an incompatible public office or employment in violation of any statutory or common law prohibition pertaining to the simultaneous holding of more than one public office or employment.(2) Disqualify a member from holding public office or employment by reason of membership on the advisory committee.(3) Require a member to forfeit public office or employment, which qualifies them for membership on the advisory committee.(f) Interim chairperson and initial meeting.--(1) The secretary shall serve as an interim chairperson 20260HB2601PN3525 - 10 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 of the advisory committee until the initial meeting of the advisory committee.(2) Upon receipt of the names of the members of the advisory committee, the secretary shall schedule the initial meeting of the advisory committee, which shall take place at an appropriate location in Harrisburg and occur not later than 60 days after the effective date of this paragraph.(3) The secretary shall notify the members of the advisory committee of the time, date and place of the initial meeting of the advisory committee.(4) At the initial meeting, the advisory committee shall organize itself by selecting from among its members a chairperson, vice chairperson and secretary.(g) Subsequent meetings.--The committee shall meet at least once each quarter of the calendar year but may meet more frequently at the call of the chairperson of the advisory committee.(h) Length of terms.--(1) Each member described in subsection (b)(6), (7) and (8) shall serve for a term of two years and may be reappointed.(2) Each member described in subsection (b)(1), (2), (3), (4) and (5) shall serve as long as the member holds the office that resulted in the appointment to the advisory committee.(i) Vacancies.--(1) A vacancy in the membership of the advisory committee shall be filled in the manner as the original appointment.(2) A member appointed to fill a vacancy occurring prior 20260HB2601PN3525 - 11 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 to the expiration date of the term for which the member's predecessor was appointed shall hold office as a member for the remainder of that term.(3) A member shall continue in office subsequent to the expiration date of the member's term until the member's successor takes office or until a period of 60 days has elapsed, whichever occurs first.(j) Purpose.--In addition to other functions described in this subchapter, the advisory committee shall, not less than once each fiscal year, do the following:(1) Evaluate the operation of the program, the implementation of the program by the counties and the efficiency of the formula for the allocations described in section 6394 (relating to allocations). In conducting an evaluation, the advisory committee shall consider how money is to be expended to provide the most appropriate programs and services for delinquent juveniles and other youthful offenders.(2) Recommend to the department, the Office of the Budget and the General Assembly any of the following:(i) Changes to the law as it pertains to the program, including the formula under section 6394.(ii) Changes in the funding level for the program, including the amounts distributed under the formula for county allocations, placement facilities and juvenile correctional facility budgets.§ 6396. Rules and regulations.(a) Authorization.--In accordance with this subchapter, the department, in consultation with the advisory committee, as appropriate, shall promulgate regulations as may be necessary 20260HB2601PN3525 - 12 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 and appropriate to carry out the provisions of this subchapter.(b) Temporary regulations.--(1) In order to facilitate the prompt implementation of this subchapter:(i) The department may issue temporary regulations.(ii) The department shall issue the temporary regulations within six months of the effective date of this section. Regulations adopted after the six-month period shall be promulgated as provided by statute.(iii) Notice of the temporary regulations shall be transmitted to the Legislative Reference Bureau for publication in the next available issue of the Pennsylvania Bulletin.(iv) The department shall post the temporary regulations on its publicly accessible Internet website.(v) The temporary regulations shall expire no later than two years following publication of the temporary regulations in the Pennsylvania Bulletin.(2) The temporary regulations under paragraph (1) shall be exempt from the following:(i) Section 612 of the act of April 9, 1929 (P.L.177, No.175), known as The Administrative Code of 1929.(ii) Sections 201, 202, 203, 204 and 205 of the act of July 31, 1968 (P.L.769, No.240), referred to as the Commonwealth Documents Law.(iii) Sections 204(b) and 301(10) of the act of October 15, 1980 (P.L.950, No.164), known as the Commonwealth Attorneys Act.(iv) The act of June 25, 1982 (P.L.633, No.181), 20260HB2601PN3525 - 13 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 known as the Regulatory Review Act.(c) Contents of regulations.--Within 120 days of the effective date of this section, the department shall promulgate temporary regulations to determine the program application and review process, the rules and procedures needed to perform their responsibilities under section 6393(e) (relating to delinquent youth care and custody funds) and any other rules or procedures as needed, as determined by the department, in consultation with the advisory committee, as appropriate.(d) Permanent regulations.--Prior to the expiration of the temporary regulations, the department, in consultation with the advisory committee, as appropriate, shall propose for approval permanent regulations as provided by statute. The proposed permanent regulations shall be consistent with subsection (c) and may be the same as the temporary regulations.§ 6397. Funding.The General Assembly shall annually appropriate the amounts that it deems to be necessary to implement and administer the program.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB2601PN3525 - 14 - 1234567891011121314151617181920